Hawaii, session 2026, HB2029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that every child in Hawaii deserves access to an education that is resourced at the highest possible standard. Currently, a significant disparity exists between the per-pupil funding provided to public school students through the weighted student formula and the resources available to students at leading independent schools in the State, such as ʻIolani School and Punahou School. The legislature further finds that to achieve true educational equity, the State must strive to bridge the resource gap between public and private institutions.  Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the committee on weights to develop recommendations for a weighted student formula that provides public school students with resource parity, including lower student-to-teacher ratios and expanded specialized programming, equivalent to the State's top-tier independent schools. SECTION 2.  Section 302A-1303.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§302A-1303.6  Weighted student formula.  (a)  Based upon recommendations from the committee on weights, the board of education [may] shall adopt no less than annually a weighted student formula for the allocation of [moneys] operating funds to public schools that takes into account the [educational] relative differences and needs of [each student; provided that weighted student formula moneys shall not be used for state-funded prekindergarten programs, except for special education and Title I-funded prekindergarten programs.  The department, upon the receipt of appropriated moneys, shall use the weighted student formula to allocate funds to public schools.  Principals shall expend moneys provided to the principals' schools.  This section shall only apply to charter schools for fiscal years in which the charter schools elect pursuant to section 302D-29 to receive allocations according to the procedures and methodology used to calculate the weighted student formula allocation.] individual schools. (b)  In formulating its recommendations to the board, the committee on weights shall incorporate a resource parity standard, which shall include but not be limited to: (1)  Reducing student-teacher ratios to levels comparable to leading independent schools in the State; (2)  Ensuring funding for specialized instructors and staff across a comprehensive range of academic, vocational, and enrichment programs to support well-rounded education; and (3)  Calculating a base per-pupil allocation that reflects the actual cost of providing a world-class education as demonstrated by the State's premier non-profit independent educational institutions. (c)  The department shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session on the progress made toward achieving resource parity between the public school system and the State's independent schools." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________